Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-406 Formal testacy
proceedings; contested cases; testimony of attesting witnesses. (a) If
evidence concerning execution of an attested will which is not self-proved is
necessary in contested cases, the testimony of at least one of the attesting witnesses,
if within the State, competent and able to testify, is required. Due execution
of an attested or unattested will may be proved by other evidence.

(b) If the will is self-proved, compliance
with signature requirements for execution is conclusively presumed and other
requirements of execution are presumed subject to rebuttal without the
testimony of any witness upon filing the will and the acknowledgment and
affidavits annexed or attached thereto, unless there is proof of fraud or
forgery affecting the acknowledgment or affidavit. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next